Florida, session 2026, HB1355.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1355-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1355 2026
Section 1. Section 83.684, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
83.684 Rent reporting.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Credit reporting agency" means an agency that, for
monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis,
regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of
assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other
information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer
reports to third parties, and that uses any means or facility of
interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing
consumer reports. The term includes agencies such as Equifax,
Experian, and TransUnion.
(b) "Rent reporting service" means a third-party service
that collects, verifies, and reports rent payment information to
a credit reporting agency.
(2) A landlord may report a tenant's rent payment history
to one or more credit reporting agencies. Rent reporting must be
conducted through a rent reporting service or the landlord may
report directly to one or more credit reporting agencies if the
landlord complies with all applicable state and federal
regulations.
(3)(a) A landlord must obtain written consent to report
rent payments from a tenant when a rental agreement is executed
or renewed.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1355-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1355 2026
(b) The written consent must clearly outline the potential
benefits and risks associated with rent reporting, including the
possibility of negative reporting if rent payments are not made
on time.
(c) A tenant must be informed that his or her consent for
rent reporting is voluntary and that the tenant may opt out of
rent reporting at any time without penalty by mailing or
delivering to the landlord a true copy of a written notice to
opt out.
(d) A landlord must, in accordance with s. 83.56(4),
provide a tenant with at least 30 days' written notice if the
landlord decides to start or stop reporting rent payments.
(4)(a) If a landlord elects to engage in rent reporting,
the landlord may require the tenant to pay to the landlord a fee
for such service. The fee may not exceed the lesser of the
actual cost to the landlord to provide rent reporting services
or $10 per month. If the landlord does not incur actual expenses
relating to rent reporting, the landlord may not charge the
tenant a fee under this subsection.
(b) A landlord may not do any of the following:
1. Report the payment or nonpayment of the fee to a credit
reporting agency.
2. Terminate a tenant's rental agreement because the
tenant did not pay the fee.
3. Deduct the amount of the fee from the tenant's deposit
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1355-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1355 2026
money or rent.
(c) If the fee is unpaid for 30 days or more, the landlord
may stop reporting the tenant's rental payments to the credit
reporting agency or rent reporting service.
(5) If a tenant opts out of rent reporting or the tenant
fails to pay a fee for rent reporting services under subsection
(4), the tenant may not elect to again participate in rent
reporting for at least 6 months after the date on which the
landlord received the written request to opt out or the date on
which the fee under subsection (4) first becomses due.
(6) A landlord may not terminate a tenant's rental
agreement, increase a tenant's rent, or engage in any other form
of retaliation solely because a tenant refuses, declines, or
opts out of participating in rent reporting.
(7) This section does not apply to a landlord of a
residential building that contains 15 or fewer dwelling units
unless both of the following apply:
(a) The landlord owns more than one residential building,
regardless of the number of dwelling units in each building.
(b) The landlord is:
1. A real estate investment trust;
2. A corporation; or
3. A limited liability company in which at least one
member is a corporation.
100 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1355-00